Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB251.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2866YC (1) 91 sb/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 483A.8, subsection 3, paragraph c, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 c. (1) (a) The commission shall annually limit to six 3 thousand the number of nonresidents allowed to have antlered 4 or any sex deer hunting licenses. Of the six thousand 5 nonresident antlered or any sex deer hunting licenses issued, 6 five hundred of the licenses shall be reserved for nonresidents 7 who have made a reservation with an outfitter that is currently 8 registered as a business entity with the secretary of state and 9 has maintained registration since prior to July 1, 2024, as 10 proven by a certification from the outfitter. A nonresident 11 may only receive one license under this subsection. If fewer 12 than five hundred nonresidents apply for a reserved license by 13 the application deadline set by the commission by rule, any 14 license not issued shall be made available for purchase at the 15 same time and in the same manner as other excess nonresident 16 antlered or any sex deer hunting licenses. Not more than 17 thirty-five percent of the issued reserved licenses shall be 18 bow season licenses. The nonresidentâs license application 19 shall include evidence that the reservation is scheduled during 20 a period in which the license is valid. Of the six thousand 21 remaining nonresident antlered or any sex deer hunting licenses 22 issued, not more than thirty-five percent of the licenses shall 23 be bow season licenses. 24 (b) For purposes of this subparagraph, âoutfitterâ means a 25 business that offers any of the following services in relation 26 to hunting: 27 (i) Transportation services for individuals, equipment, 28 supplies, or wildlife by means of a vehicle, vessel, or pack 29 animal. 30 (ii) Facilities services including but not limited to 31 providing tents, cabins, camp gear, food, or similar supplies, 32 equipment, or accommodations. 33 (iii) Guiding, leading, packing, protecting, supervising, 34 instructing, or training individuals or groups in the take or 35 -1- LSB 2866YC (1) 91 sb/js 1/ 2 H.F. _____ attempted take of wildlife. 1 (2) After the six thousand antlered or any sex nonresident 2 deer hunting licenses have been issued, all additional licenses 3 shall be issued for antlerless deer only. The commission shall 4 annually determine the number of nonresident antlerless deer 5 only deer hunting licenses that will be available for issuance. 6